Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2736YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 562 Section 1. Section 103A.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Notwithstanding any provision of law 3 to the contrary, the owner of a structure that is damaged 4 or destroyed by an accident, weather event, or similar 5 casualty may repair or reconstruct the structure to the same 6 condition in which the structure existed immediately prior 7 to the accident, weather event, or similar casualty if the 8 owner begins repair or reconstruction within ten years of the 9 accident, weather event, or similar casualty. 10